Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-621
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 68-621 to 68-630:

(1) Referendum group means the employees of the state, a single political subdivision of this state, or any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other state or states, the employees of which are or may be members of a retirement system covering such employees, except that: (a) The employees of the University of Nebraska shall constitute a referendum group; (b) the employees of a Class V school district shall constitute a referendum group; (c) all employees of the State of Nebraska who are or may be members of the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, including employees of institutions operated by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, employees of institutions operated by the Department of Correctional Services and the Department of Health and Human Services, and employees subordinate to the State Board of Education, shall constitute a referendum group; and (d) all employees of school districts of the State of Nebraska, county superintendents, and county school administrators, who are or may be members of the School Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, shall constitute a single referendum group.

(2) Managing authority means the board, committee, or council having general authority over a political subdivision, university, college, or school district whose employees constitute or are included in a referendum group; the managing authority of the state shall be the Governor; and insofar as sections 68-601 to 68-631 may be applicable to county superintendents and county school administrators, managing authority means the board of county commissioners or county supervisors of the county in which the county superintendent was elected or with which the county school administrator contracted.

(3) Eligible employees means employees of the state or any political subdivision of the state who at or during the time of voting in a referendum are in positions covered by a retirement system, are members of such retirement system, and were in such positions at the time of giving of the notice of such referendum, as required by sections 68-621 to 68-630, except that no such employee shall be considered an eligible employee if at the time of such voting such employee is in a position to which the state agreement applies.

(4) State agreement means the agreement between the State of Nebraska and the designated officer of the United States of America entered into pursuant to section 68-603.

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 15, p. 821;

Laws 1969, c. 537, § 1, p. 2187;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 297;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 20;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 13;

Laws 2024, LB686, § 15.